Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4008
Board; voting members; expenses.

All voting members of the board shall be entitled to expenses as provided for in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 while attending meetings of the board or while engaged in the performance of official responsibilities as determined by the board.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 9.
January 1, 2021